North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-02.2 Accountants
43-02.2-12.
Unlawful acts.

A person or firm that is not a licensee or otherwise authorized to practice in this state under subsection 1 of section 43-02.2-04.1 or subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 43-02.2-06 may not practice or offer to practice public accountancy or issue a report on financial statements of any other person, firm, organization, or governmental unit. Individual licensees may not practice public accountancy unless they do so within a firm that holds a permit issued under this chapter or is otherwise exempt from the firm permit requirement. These prohibitions do not apply to an officer, partner, or employee of any firm or organization affixing the person’s name or signature to any statement or report in reference to the financial affairs of such firm or organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office that the signer holds therein, does not prohibit any act of a public official or employee in the performance of duties as such, and does not prohibit the performance by any persons of other services involving the use of accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns, management advisory services, and the preparation of financial statements without the issuance of reports thereon. This prohibition does not apply to transactions between manufacturing and sales organizations and their customers when accounting services accompany the sale of products provided that such accounting services are incidental and that any financial report made is clearly titled “unaudited financial report”.

A person not holding a valid certificate or practice privilege issued under this chapter may not use or assume the title or designation “certified public accountant”, or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person is a certified public accountant.

A firm may not practice public accountancy or assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant”, or the abbreviation “CPA”, or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm is a certified public accountant firm unless the firm holds a valid permit issued under this chapter or is otherwise exempt from the firm permit requirement.

A person may not assume or use the title or designation “licensed public accountant” or the abbreviation “LPA”, or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person is a licensed public accountant unless the person is registered as provided in section 43-02.2-07.

A firm may not practice public accountancy, or assume or use the title or designation “licensed public accountant”, the abbreviation “LPA”, or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm is a licensed public accountant firm unless the firm holds a valid permit issued under this chapter or is otherwise exempt from the firm permit requirement.

A person or firm not holding a valid certificate, license, practice privilege, or permit issued under this chapter or otherwise exempt from the firm permit requirement may not assume or use the title or designation “certified accountant”, “chartered accountant”, “enrolled accountant”, “licensed accountant”, “public accountant”, “registered accountant”, “accredited accountant”, or any other title or designation likely to be confused with the titles “certified public accountant” or “licensed public accountant”, or use any of the abbreviations “CA”, “LA”, “PA”, “RA”, “AA”, or similar abbreviation likely to be confused with the abbreviations “CPA” or “LPA”.

A person or firm not holding a valid certificate, license, practice privilege, or permit issued under this chapter or otherwise exempt from such requirement may not assume or use any title or designation that includes the words “accountant”, “auditor”, or “accounting”, or other terms in any manner that implies such person or firm holds such a certificate, license, or permit or has special competence as an accountant or auditor. This subsection does not prohibit any officer, partner, or employee of any firm or organization from affixing the person’s name or signature to any reference to the financial affairs of such firm or organization with any wording designating the position, title, or office that the person holds and does not prohibit any act of a public official or employee in the performance of duties.

A licensee may not use a professional or firm name or designation that is misleading. Names of one or more former partners or shareholders may be included in the name of a firm or its successor.

This section does not apply to a person or firm holding a certification, designation, degree, or license granted in a foreign country entitling the holder to engage in the practice of public accountancy or its equivalent in that country, whose activities in this state are limited to the provision of professional services to persons or firms who are residents of, governments of, or business entities of the country in which the person or firm holds such entitlement. This subsection does not authorize issuing reports with respect to the financial statements of any other persons, firms, or governmental units in this state. A person or firm acting under the authority of this subsection may not use in this state any title or designation other than the one under which the person or firm practices in such country, followed by a translation of such title or designation into the English language, if it is in a different language, and by the name of such country.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 13; 1999, ch. 372, § 10; 2009, ch. 357, § 8.

43-02.2-13.
Injunctions against unlawful acts.

If as a result of an investigation, the board believes that any person or firm has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of this chapter, the board may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining such acts or practices, and upon a showing by the board that such person or firm has engaged, or is about to engage, in any such acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order, or other appropriate order must be granted by the court.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 14.

43-02.2-14.
Criminal penalties.

If by reason of an investigation, the board has reason to believe that any person or firm has knowingly engaged in acts or practices that constitute a violation of this chapter, the board may bring its information to the attention of a state’s attorney or the attorney general or other appropriate law enforcement officer who may cause appropriate criminal proceedings to be brought.

Any person or firm who knowingly violates any provision of section 43-02.2-12 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 15.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. §

12.1-32-01.

43-02.2-15.
Single act evidence of practice.

In any action brought under this chapter, evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited by this chapter is sufficient to justify a penalty, injunction, restraining order, or conviction, without evidence of a general course of conduct.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 16; 1999, ch. 372, § 11.

43-02.2-16.
Confidential communications.

Except by permission of the client engaging a licensee under this chapter, or the heirs, successors, or personal representatives of such client, a licensee or any partner, officer, shareholder, or employee of a licensee may not voluntarily disclose information communicated to the licensee by the client relating to and in connection with services rendered to the client by the licensee. Such information is deemed confidential but this section may not be construed as prohibiting the disclosure of information required to be disclosed by the standards of the profession in reporting on the examination of financial statements or as prohibiting disclosures in court proceedings, in investigations or proceedings under section 43-02.2-09 or 43-02.2-10, in ethical investigations conducted by private professional organizations, or in the course of practice reviews, or to other persons active in the organization performing services for that client on a need-to-know basis or to persons in the entity who need this information for the sole purpose of assuring quality control.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 17; 1999, ch. 372, § 12.

43-02.2-17.
Licensees’ working papers — Clients’ records.

All statements, records, schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a licensee or a partner, shareholder, officer, director, or employee of a licensee, incident to, or in the course of, rendering services to a client while a licensee, except the reports submitted by the licensee to the client and except for records that are part of the client’s records, are the property of the licensee in the absence of an express agreement between the licensee and the client to the contrary. A statement, record, schedule, working paper, or memorandum may not be sold, transferred, or bequeathed, without the consent of the client or the client’s personal representative or assignee, to anyone other than one or more surviving partners or stockholders or new partners or stockholders of the licensee, or any combined or merged firm or successor in interest to the licensee. This section may not be construed as prohibiting any temporary transfer of workpapers or other material necessary in the course of carrying out practice reviews.

A licensee shall furnish to a client or former client, upon request and reasonable notice:

A copy of the licensee’s working papers, to the extent that such working papers include records that would ordinarily constitute part of the client’s records and are not otherwise available to the client; and

Any accounting or other records belonging to, or obtained from or on behalf of, the client that the licensee removed from the client’s premises or received for the client’s account. The licensee may make and retain copies of such documents of the client when they form the basis for work done by the licensee.

This section does not require a licensee to keep any workpaper beyond the period prescribed in any other applicable statute.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 18; 1999, ch. 372, § 13.

43-02.2-18.
Uniform statute of limitations.

This section applies to all causes of action of the type specified in this section filed on or after August 1, 1993.

This section governs any action based on negligence or breach of contract brought against any accountant, any partnership of accountants, any accounting corporation, or any other legal entity of accountants registered, licensed, or practicing in this state by any person or entity claiming to have been injured as a result of financial statements or other information examined, compiled, reviewed, certified, audited, or otherwise reported or opined on by the defendant accountant as a result of an engagement to provide public accounting services.

An action covered by this section may not be brought in any court in this state unless the suit is commenced on or before the earlier of:

Two years from the date the alleged act, omission, or neglect is discovered or should have been discovered by the exercise of reasonable diligence; or

Six years after the service for which the suit is brought has been performed or the date of the initial issuance of the accountant’s report on the financial statements or other information, whichever comes first.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 417, § 19.